Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 14
ADJUDICATION OF WATER RIGHTS

Sec.

§ 42-1401. Legislative intent.

The legislature finds and declares that the state laws and procedures for the adjudication of rights to the use of water need to be modified:

to provide a statutory procedure for incorporating a negotiated agreement between a federal reserved water right claimant and the state of Idaho into an adjudication;

to provide a more efficient method for adjudications;

to assure that state laws and procedures provide a fair and impartial forum for the adjudication of the rights of all claimants; and

to assure that state laws and procedures are adequate as a matter of federal law to adjudicate all water rights claimed to have been established under federal law and to administer such rights.

§ 42-1401A. Definitions.

The following terms are defined for purposes of this chapter as follows:

“Claimant” means any person asserting ownership of rights to the use of water within the state of Idaho or on whose behalf ownership of rights to the use of water is asserted.

“Department” means the Idaho department of water resources.

“Director” means collectively the director of the Idaho department of water resources and the Idaho department of water resources.

“Domestic use” is defined in section 42-111, Idaho Code.

“General adjudication” means an action both for the judicial determination of the extent and priority of the rights of all persons to use water from any water system within the state of Idaho that is conclusive as to the nature of all rights to the use of water in the adjudicated water system, except as provided in section 42-1420, Idaho Code, and for the administration of those rights.

“Party” means any person who is a claimant or any person who is served or joined.

“Person” means an individual, a partnership, a trust, an estate, a corporation, a municipal corporation, the state of Idaho or any political subdivision, the United States, an Indian tribe, or any other public or private entity, except that “person” does not include the director of the department or the department.

“Private adjudication” means an action commenced in accordance with section 42-1404, Idaho Code, for the judicial determination of both the extent and priority of the rights of named persons to the use of water from any water system within the state of Idaho, for which a general adjudication has not been commenced or completed, that binds only those persons joined in the action and for the administration of such rights.

“Purchaser” means any successor in interest of a claimant, whether the interest is acquired by purchase, gift, inheritance, or other means.

“Supplemental adjudication” means an action commenced in accordance with section 42-1424, Idaho Code, for the judicial determination of both the extent and priority of the rights of a person to the use of water from any water system within the state of Idaho which has been adjudicated in a general adjudication or in a private adjudication.

“Stock watering use” means the use of water solely for livestock or wildlife where the total diversion is not in excess of thirteen thousand (13,000) gallons per day.

“Water system” includes all rivers, streams, lakes, springs, ground waters, or other sources within this state, including any river system or other source, as used in 43 U.S.C. section 666.

Party.

Canal companies could not seek action for declaratory judgment of administrative rules concerning conjunctive management of ground and surface water rights for the entire state adopted by Idaho department of water resources (IDWR) in Snake River basin adjudication (SRBA), since IDWR must be a party to the action and IDWR cannot be a party to SRBA. Twin Falls Canal Co. v. Idaho Dep’t of Water Resources, 127 Idaho 688, 905 P.2d 89 (1995).

§ 42-1401B. Role of the director in an adjudication.

The director’s role under this chapter is as an independent expert and technical assistant to assure that claims to water rights acquired under state law are accurately reported in accordance with the procedures of chapter 14, title 42, Idaho Code. The director shall make recommendations as to the extent of beneficial use and administration of each water right under state law and may use uniform parameters for quantification of beneficial use recommended for rights within climatic regions of the state.

The director shall not be a claimant on behalf of the state or any subdivision of the state in an adjudication.

The director shall not be a party to an adjudication.

§ 42-1401C. Role of state agencies other than the Idaho department of water resources in an adjudication.

Each state agency, and the Idaho water resource board may file a claim and appear separately in any adjudication through the attorney general. This section shall not apply to the Idaho department of water resources.

The attorney general may appear in any adjudication and shall represent the position of the state of Idaho.

§ 42-1401D. Jurisdictional limitation.

Review of an agency action of the department of water resources, which is subject to judicial review or declaratory judgment under the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, shall not be heard in any water rights adjudication proceeding commenced under this chapter. Venue and jurisdiction over any such action pending on the effective date of this section, or initiated subsequent thereto, shall be in the district court as authorized under the provisions of section 67-5272, Idaho Code, without regard to any other provision of law.

§ 42-1402. Decreed rights appurtenant to land — Water rights established under federal law excepted.

In allotting the waters of any water system by the district court according to the rights and priorities of those using such waters, such allotment shall be made to the use to which such water is beneficially applied, except where water rights established under federal law are involved, in which case the allotment shall be made in accordance with federal law. The right confirmed by such decree or allotment shall be appurtenant to and shall become a part of the land on which the water is used, and such right will pass with the conveyance of such land, and such decree shall describe the land to which such water shall become so appurtenant. The amount of water so allotted shall never be in excess of the amount actually used for beneficial purposes for which such right is claimed, or in the case of a water right established under federal law, in excess of that amount determined by federal law.

§ 42-1403. Certified copies of allotments.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of the district court in each of the counties of this state to prepare at the expense of the county, and transmit without delay to the department of water resources by express or registered mail, a certified copy of the allotments of the various streams, made by the district court and now on file in the offices of the district court in the various counties of the state: provided, that said clerk may, in place of such transcript, transmit such original records of such decrees as are recorded in books kept for that purpose. Immediately upon receipt of said transcripts or said original records, it shall be the duty of the department to record them in its files, and to classify and arrange said decrees by placing all the rights to water of one stream and its tributaries together, and the department shall send to each watermaster a certified copy of the allotments made by the district court of all the streams within his district. And when an allotment of the waters of a stream shall be made by the district court, the clerk of such district court shall immediately prepare, at the expense of the county, and transmit to the department of water resources, a certified copy of the decree allotting such waters. The director may issue an abstract of decreed water right which shall describe the elements of a water right as contained in the water right decree.

§ 42-1404. Private actions for adjudication of water rights.

Any claimant may file suit in the district court for the county in which the point of diversion or place of use of the claimed right is located for the purpose of adjudicating rights to the use of water from any water system for which a general adjudication has not been commenced or completed. The claimant shall set forth in his complaint the claimed water right in a notice of claim form furnished by the director. The claimant shall join all claimants of rights to the use of water from the water system whose joinder is necessary to resolve the dispute over rights to the use of water from the water system. The claimant shall also publish notice of the action in the manner specified in subsection (2)(b) of section42-1408A [42-1408], Idaho Code.

Any party who may be injured and who objects to the water right claimed by the claimant shall, within forty-five (45) days of the date of first publication of notice, file with the district court written notice of such objection stating the reasons for the objection. A copy of the objection shall be served upon the claimant, all other parties of record in the action, the watermasters, and the director.

Any claimant of a right to the use of water from the water system being adjudicated shall be entitled to intervene and have the claimed right adjudicated. Any such claimant requesting intervention shall set forth the claimed water right in a notice of claim form furnished by the director. The court may request a director’s report of the director, as described in section 42-1411, Idaho Code, as to those rights to be determined. The director shall advise the district court as to whether the director will commence an examination of the water system in accordance with the provisions of section 42-1410, Idaho Code. If the director elects not to conduct an examination, the adjudication shall proceed based on the description of the water right in the notice of claim form. Each claimant shall have the burden of proof of establishing each element of a water right described in the claimants notice of claim form.

The director shall provide to the court an estimate of the costs that will be incurred in conducting the examination and in preparing the director’s report and an approximate time when the director’s report will be completed. The court shall order the claimants of the rights to be determined to submit a notice of claim to the director in accordance with section 42-1409, Idaho Code, except that the fee as described in section 42-1414, Idaho Code, shall not apply. Upon the completion of claims-taking, the director shall bill each claimant for a claim fee equal to that claimant’s proportionate share of the total estimated cost to the state relative to that claimant’s share of the total amount of water claimed by all claimants or for an amount as determined by the court. Any notice of claim for a water right for which the fee is unpaid after thirty (30) days from billing by the director shall be incomplete and may be rejected. Prior to filing of the report with the court, the claimants shall pay the balance of the department’s verified costs or be refunded any unused estimated costs advanced to the department in the same proportion as described above. In the event that a claimant shall contest the department’s costs, the court shall then determine the reasonable costs to be paid by each claimant.

Notice of the filing of the director’s report shall be given and objections to the director’s report shall be made and heard as provided in sections 42-1411 and 42-1412, Idaho Code.
(6) The decree, which shall be entered pursuant to section 42-1412, Idaho Code, shall contain or incorporate a statement of each element of a water right as stated in subsection (2) of section 42-1411, Idaho Code, as applicable. The decree shall also determine all other matters necessary for the efficient administration of the water rights. The decree shall be conclusive as to the rights determined in the proceeding only as to those persons party to the proceeding.

(7) Any party who has appeared and is aggrieved by the decree of the district court may appeal in accordance with the Idaho appellate rules.

§ 42-1405. General adjudication — Public interest.

Five (5) or more or a majority of the users of water from any water system may petition the director to request the attorney general to file an action to commence a general adjudication. If the director deems that the public interest and necessity will be served by a determination of the water rights of that water system, the director shall request the attorney general to file an action to commence the general adjudication.

If the director deems that the public interest and necessity will be served by a determination of the water rights of any water system, the director, upon his own initiative, may request the attorney general to file an action to commence a general adjudication.

§ 42-1405a. Construction of §§ 42-1404 and 42-1406. [Repealed.]

§ 42-1406. General adjudication — Contents of petition.

A petition for a general adjudication shall contain among other things, the following:

a description of the proposed boundaries of the water system to be adjudicated and administered;

a statement of why the public interest and necessity would be served by a general adjudication;

a list of counties where the water system proposed to be adjudicated and administered is located and a designation of whether all or only a portion of the county is included within the boundaries of the proposed general adjudication;

a description of the general method proposed to ascertain and to serve claimants not disclosed following completion of the service required by paragraphs (a) through (d) of subsection (2) of section 42-1408, Idaho Code; and

a prayer for relief requesting the district court to enter an order that commences the general adjudication.

A petition for entry of an order commencing a general adjudication shall be captioned: “In Re the General Adjudication of Rights to the Use of Water From the . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Water System.” Such action shall have no other caption.

§ 42-1406A. Snake River basin adjudication

Commencement. [Uncodified.]

§ 42-1406B. Northern Idaho water rights adjudications — Commencement.

Effective management of the waters of northern Idaho requires that a comprehensive determination of the nature, extent and priority of the rights of users of surface and ground water be determined. Therefore, the director of the department of water resources is authorized to petition the district court to commence adjudications within the terms of the McCarran amendment, 43 U.S.C. section 666, of the water rights from surface water and ground water sources in northern Idaho through initiation of three (3) proceedings, provided that each petition includes a request for the deferral of the adjudication of domestic and stock water rights as defined by subsections (4) and (11) of section 42-1401A, Idaho Code, and a request that a commencement order be issued only if the court determines it is possible to defer the adjudication of domestic and stock water rights as defined by subsections (4) and (11) of section 42-1401A, Idaho Code, within the terms of the McCarran amendment. Separate petitions shall be filed for water rights adjudications for each of the following river basins, and related ground water sources whether or not hydraulically connected to a surface water source, within Idaho: the Coeur d’Alene-Spokane river basin, the Palouse river basin, and the Clark Fork-Pend Oreille river basins, which do not include basin 98. The filing of each petition shall be contingent on legislative funding approval. Each petition shall describe the boundaries of the water source or water sources to be adjudicated.

The adjudication shall be brought in any district court in which any part of the water source is located or before a court of special jurisdiction for water right adjudications. Unless otherwise ordered by the supreme court, special jurisdiction for the water rights general adjudications authorized by this section shall reside in the Snake River Basin Adjudication district court of the fifth judicial district of the state of Idaho, in and for the county of Twin Falls. The clerk of the district court in which the petition is filed shall send to the supreme court a true and certified copy of the petition. The supreme court, by order, shall assign the judge to preside over the general adjudication. Venue of the general adjudication shall be determined by order or rule of the supreme court and venue of hearings under the general adjudication shall be determined by order of the presiding judge.

Upon issuance of an order by the district court which authorizes the director to commence an investigation and determination of the various water rights to be adjudicated from the water source or water sources, and which defines the boundaries of the source or sources within the state to be adjudicated, the director of the department of water resources shall proceed in the manner provided under the provisions of chapter 14, title 42, Idaho Code, to the extent not inconsistent with the provisions of this section.

§ 42-1406C. Bear river water rights adjudication — Commencement.

Effective management of the waters of the Bear River basin requires that a comprehensive determination of the nature, extent, and priority of the rights of all users of surface and ground water be determined. Therefore, the director of the department of water resources is authorized to petition the district court to commence an adjudication within the terms of the McCarran amendment, 43 U.S.C. 666, of the water rights from surface water and ground water sources in the Bear River basin. The petition shall describe the boundaries of the water source(s) to be adjudicated and contain a request that a commencement order be issued only if the court determines it is possible to defer the adjudication of domestic and stock water rights as defined by subsections (4) and (11) of section 42-1401A, Idaho Code, within the terms of the McCarran amendment.

For purposes of adjudicating water rights, the Bear River basin is defined as all waters of the state of Idaho, both ground water and surface water, flowing into or toward the Bear River or flowing toward the Great Salt Lake in the Great Basin.

The adjudication shall be brought before a court of special jurisdiction for water right adjudications. Unless otherwise ordered by the supreme court, special jurisdiction for the general adjudication authorized by this section shall reside in the Snake River Basin Adjudication district court of the fifth judicial district of the state of Idaho, in and for the county of Twin Falls. The clerk of the district court in which the petition is filed shall send to the supreme court a true and certified copy of the petition. The supreme court, by order, shall assign the judge to preside over the general adjudication. Venue of the general adjudication shall be determined by order or rule of the supreme court, and venue of hearings under the general adjudication shall be determined by order of the presiding judge.

Once the district court issues an order that authorizes the director to commence an investigation and determination of the water rights within the boundaries of the adjudication and defines the boundaries of the adjudication, the director of the department of water resources shall proceed in the manner provided under the provisions of chapter 14, title 42, Idaho Code, to the extent not inconsistent with the provisions of this section.

§ 42-1407. General adjudication — Venue — Notice of filing — Commencement order.

A general adjudication shall be brought in any district court in which any part of the water system within the state of Idaho is located. The clerk of the district court in which the petition is filed shall send to the supreme court a true and certified copy of the petition. The supreme court, by order, shall assign the judge to preside over the general adjudication. Venue of the general adjudication shall be determined by order or rule of the supreme court and venue of hearings under the general adjudication shall be determined by order of the presiding judge.

The director shall prepare, in plain and concise language, and publish a notice of filing of a petition for entry of an order commencing a general adjudication for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which any part of the water system proposed to be adjudicated is located. If there is no newspaper published within a county, then the notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in that county. The date set for hearing on the petition shall not be less than twenty (20) days after the last date of publication. The director shall serve the notice of filing a petition on the United States and on the state of Idaho. The director shall file affidavit(s) of service of the notice of filing with the district court upon completion of service.

The notice of filing shall contain:

a description of the boundaries of the water system proposed for the general adjudication;

a statement of the date, place, and time of hearing before the district court;

a concise statement of the matters proposed to be considered before the district court; and

a statement that the district court will hear evidence and legal argument from any person in response to any matter raised by the petition.

With respect to a general adjudication commenced pursuant to section 42-1405, Idaho Code, if the district court determines that the public interest and necessity will be served by a general adjudication, the district court shall enter an order that includes the following:

a provision that commences the general adjudication;

a description of the boundaries of the water system for which a general adjudication is commenced;

a list of counties where the water system to be adjudicated and administered is located and a designation of whether all or only a portion of the county is included within the boundaries of the general adjudication;

a provision that requires all claimants to file a notice of claim or negotiated agreement for all water rights from the water system, except that the court may exclude those types of water rights designated in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 42-1420, Idaho Code;

a determination of the method of service for claimants not disclosed following completion of the service required by paragraphs (a) through (d) of subsection (2) of section 42-1408, Idaho Code; and

a statement that the files of the district court will contain affidavits of service and other documents stating the persons served with a copy of the notice of order commencing the general adjudication.
(5) Upon entry of a commencement order, the general adjudication shall proceed in accordance with this chapter.

(6) Promptly upon entry of the commencement order, the clerk of the district court shall send a certified copy of the order to the director, and shall serve notice of entry of the order on all persons appearing before the court in accordance with the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

§ 42-1408. Service of notice of order commencing a general adjudication.

Upon entry of a district court’s order commencing a general adjudication, the director shall prepare a notice of order, using plain and concise language, that contains the following information or enclosures:

an order commencing a general adjudication has been entered, the date of entry of the order, and the district court that entered the order;

an illustration of the boundaries of the water system to be adjudicated and administered;

that section 42-1409, Idaho Code, requires in a general adjudication all claimants, except as specifically excluded by law, to file for each water right, a notice of claim on a form furnished by the director; failure to file a required notice of claim will result in a court determination that no water right exists for the use of water for which the required notice of claim was not filed;

a notice of claim is required for any water right license and for any water right permit on file for which the director requires a permit holder to file a notice of claim in accordance with section 42-1409, Idaho Code; a notice of claim may be filed for any other water right permit;

a notice of claim is not required for a water right evidenced by an application on file with the department;

a notice of claim, if the court order excludes any uses from an adjudication, may be filed for the excluded use prior to the filing of the director’s report with the district court and the right will be determined, even though a notice of claim is not required;

a notice of claim is not required for any person who receives water solely by virtue of ownership of shares of stock in, or by being located within the boundaries of, a water delivery organization, if the water delivery organization holds legal title to the water right and if the water delivery organization files a notice of claim;

the date set by the director for filing a timely notice of claim, which shall not be less than ninety (90) days after service;

that section 42-1409A, Idaho Code, imposes substantial restrictions on the filing of amended or late notices of claim;

the locations at which the notice of claim forms will be available;

section 42-1414, Idaho Code, requires each claimant, other than those exempted by federal law, to pay a variable fee to the director with a notice of claim; failure to pay the fee will result in rejection of the notice of claim; failure to file a timely notice of claim will result in the assessment of a late fee in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) or fifteen per cent (15%) of the original filing fee, whichever is greater;

section 42-1409, Idaho Code, requires that all purchasers of a water right inquire of the director whether a notice of claim has been filed, and if not, to file a notice of claim, except as specifically excluded by law, and that all claimants and purchasers provide the director written notice of any change in ownership, along with some evidence of ownership or of any change in mailing address; and

the files of the district court will contain affidavits of service or other documents stating the persons served with a copy of the notice of order.

The director shall serve copies of the notice of order as follows:
(a) the director shall serve the notice of order on the state of Idaho and the United States;

The director shall send the notice of order by ordinary mail to all persons who submit a written request to the director to be notified of the commencement of an adjudication. The director may circulate copies in any additional manner the director deems appropriate.

Upon expiration of the period for filing notices of claims, the director shall conduct a second round of service in conformance with this subsection. The director shall compare the notices of claims with department records and other information reasonably available to determine whether there are any rights to water from the water system for which no notice of claim was filed. In the event the director determines that not all claimants have filed claims, the director shall make a reasonably diligent effort in accordance with the court order to determine the land to which the possible claim is appurtenant, the last known owner of that land, and the last known address of that owner. The director shall prepare a second round notice of order. The director shall serve this notice on the last known owner in accordance with the court order. The notice shall contain the information specified in subsection (1) of this section, except that the notice shall state a final date for filing notices of claims. The final date shall be an additional period of time, in no case less than ninety (90) days from the date the notice is served, in which the notice of claim must be received by the director.

The director shall file with the district court such proof of service as may be required to demonstrate compliance with the above requirements.

(b) the director shall serve the notice of order on claimants other than the persons in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, initially by publication once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which any part of the water system, which is the subject of the general adjudication, is located. If there is no newspaper published within a county, then the copies shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in that county;

(c) the director shall post the notice of order in each county courthouse, county recorder’s office, and county assessor’s office in which any part of the water system is located. The director shall complete the posting on or before the date of the last publication within each county;

(d) the director shall serve the notice of order by ordinary mail on each person listed as owning real property on the real property assessment roll within the boundaries of the water system to be adjudicated at the address listed on the real property assessment roll; and

(e) the director shall file a copy of the notice of order commencing a general adjudication in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any part of the water system is located; notwithstanding the provisions of section 5-505, Idaho Code, the notice, from the time it is filed with the recorder for record, is constructive notice of the contents thereof within the county in which the notice is recorded, to subsequent purchasers and mortgagees.

§ 42-1408A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 42-1409. Notice of claim.

The director shall prepare and furnish on request a standard notice of claim form.

the name and address of the claimant;

the source of water;

the quantity of water claimed:

the quantity of water claimed to be used for water rights acquired under state law shall describe the rate of diversion or, for an instream flow claim, a rate of water flow in cubic feet per second or the annual volume of diversion of water for use or storage in acre-feet per year, or both;

the quantity of water claimed for water rights established under federal law shall describe for each and every purpose the rate of present and future water diversion or, in the case of an instream flow claim the rate of flow in cubic feet per second or annual volume of present and future diversion in acre-feet per year or both;

the date of priority claimed:

the date of priority claimed for water rights acquired under state law shall be from any license, permit, or decree; or if the right is not based upon a license, permit, or decree, then the date when the water was first applied to beneficial use;

the date of priority claimed for water rights established under federal law shall be determined in accordance with federal law;

the number thereof, if founded upon a right on file with the department; or if the right is founded upon judicial decree not on file with the department, then the title of the court and cause, number of the action and the date of entry;

the legal description of the existing point(s) of diversion; if the claim is for an instream flow, then a legal description of the beginning and ending points of the claimed instream flow;

the purpose(s) of use and the period of use:

the purpose(s) of use for water rights acquired under state law shall describe each purpose of use and the period of the year when water is used for each purpose;

the purpose(s) of use for a water right established under federal law shall describe the purposes for which the water included in the claim is presently being used, if at all, and the period of the year when water is necessary for the designated purposes;

the legal description of the place of use for a water right established under federal law shall describe the federal reservation and the existing or proposed place of use for each consumptive use;

a legal description of the place of use:

the legal description of the place of use for water rights acquired under state law shall describe the land where the water is beneficially used; if one (1) of the purposes of use is irrigation, then the number of irrigated acres within each forty (40) acre subdivision, except as provided in section 42-219, Idaho Code;

the dates of any changes or enlargements in use for water rights acquired under state law, including the dimension of the diversion works as originally constructed and as enlarged;

conditions on the exercise of any water right included in any decree, license, approved transfer application or other document; and
(k) such remarks and other matters as are necessary for definition of the right, for clarification of any element of a right or for administration of the right by the director.

With respect to any water right for which a change was approved by the director pursuant to section 42-211 or 42-222, Idaho Code, after filing the notice of claim and prior to filing of the director’s report, the claimant shall amend the notice of claim consistent with the determination of the director on the change.

Each claimant, through submission of a claim, shall solemnly swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that the statements contained in the notice of claim or amended notice of claim are true and correct.

All claimants of water rights that are included in a general adjudication shall file with the director a notice of claim for all water rights, except for those types of water rights designated in paragraphs (a) through (d) of subsection (1) of section 42-1420, Idaho Code.

Any person who fails to submit a required notice of claim shall be deemed to have been constructively served with notice of a general adjudication by publication and mailing as required by section 42-1408, Idaho Code.

Each purchaser of a water right from the water system shall inquire of the director whether a notice of claim has been filed, and if not, shall file a notice of claim in accordance with this section. All claimants and purchasers shall provide the director written notice of any change in ownership or of any change in mailing address during the pendency of a general adjudication. All purchasers shall submit some evidence of ownership along with the notice of change of ownership.

At least one hundred twenty (120) days prior to filing of the director’s report with the court, the director may notify each holder of a permit or license to appropriate water from the water system, for which proof of beneficial use was filed after entry of the court’s order commencing a general adjudication, to file a notice of claim within thirty (30) days of mailing of the notice. The director shall notify the holder of the permit or license by certified mail at the most recent address shown in the records of the department.

The district court or director may extend the time for filing a notice of claim.

The notice of claim form shall include the following:

§ 42-1409A. Amendment of notice of claims — Late notice of claims.

A claimant may amend a notice of claim or file a late notice of claim at any time prior to the final date for filing notices of claim in the notice of second round service as provided in subsection (4) of section 42-1408, Idaho Code.

A claimant may amend the name and address of a claimant at any time.

A claimant may amend a notice of claim or file a late notice of claim after the final date for filing notices of claims in the notice of second round service for good cause shown to the district court or the director.

No amendments to a notice of claim or late notices of claim shall be allowed except as authorized in subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this section.

§ 42-1410. Examination of water system and of claims.

Upon entry of the court’s order commencing a general adjudication, or as provided in section 42-1404 or 42-1424, Idaho Code, the director shall commence an examination of the water system, the canals and ditches and other works, and the uses being made of water diverted from the water system for water rights acquired under state law. The examination shall continue in a manner and for such a period of time as the director determines is necessary to evaluate the extent and nature of each water right for which a notice of claim under state law has been filed. The director may conduct any fact-finding hearing necessary for a full and adequate disclosure of the facts.

The director and other employees of the department shall have authority to go upon all lands, both public and private, for the purpose of investigating the uses of water from any water source and may require the cooperation of the claimant in investigating the claimant’s water use. The employee investigating the claimant’s use shall make a reasonable effort to contact the claimant to schedule a date and approximate time for the examination. If the well or diversion works are located in a building other than an unlocked structure used solely for housing the well or other diversion works in which there is no reasonable expectation of privacy, the employee shall only enter the building in the absence of a court order after requesting and receiving the permission of the claimant or other occupant. The director may request the district court to issue an order compelling inspection and subpoenas requiring the attendance of any witness or the production of documents in accordance with the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

Any maps prepared by the director shall be available for inspection at the offices of the department and any other locations the director may designate, for the purpose of assisting any claimant in preparing and filing claims and objections to the director’s report.